Massachusetts, session 194th, S2700.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Clause (3) of subsection (a) of section 2-5 of article 2 of the charter of the town of
Wareham, which is on file in the office of the archivist of the commonwealth, as provided in
section 12 of chapter 43B of the General Laws, is hereby amended by striking out the first
paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:-
Appointments - The capital planning committee shall consist of the finance director or
their designee and the town administrator or their designee, each of whom shall serve by virtue
of their offices; a member appointed by the planning board from the board’s membership; a
member appointed by the finance committee from the committee’s membership; 3 members
appointed by the appointing authority, which shall consist of the town moderator, who shall
serve as chair of the appointing authority, the chair of the select board and the chair of the
finance committee; and the town accountant or their designee, who shall serve as an ex-officio,
non-voting member. The town may, by by-law, provide for other conditions regarding these
appointments.
of 1